North Dakota, session 69, HB1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-21-02.10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-21-02.10. North Dakota scholarship.
AnyA resident student who meets the requirements of section 15.1-21-02.6 is eligible to receive a
North Dakota scholarship if the student:
1. Completed an individual consultative process or a nine-week course under subsection 2 of
section 15.1-21-18;
2. Completed the civics test under section 15.1-21-27;
3. Completed a four-year rolling plan, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction;
4. Obtained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, or an
equivalent course proficiency score if the student was enrolled in a school district participating
in an approved innovative education program under section 15.1-06-08.2 and the school
district obtained a waiver under section 15.1-06-08.1;
5. Completed the requirements in at least four of the following while enrolled in grades nine
through twelve:
a. Twenty-five hours of community service;
b. A ninety-five percent attendance rate as determined under section 15.1-20-02.1, not
including any school-related absences;
c. A career exploration experience, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction;
d. At least two years in organized cocurricular activities;
e. At least two years in organized extracurricular activities;
f. A capstone project, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction;
g. An online learning course; and
h. Successful demonstration of competency in twenty-first century skills, as determined by
the superintendent of public instruction; and
6. Completed the requirements in two of the following subdivisions while enrolled in grades nine
through twelve:

H. B. NO. 1098 - PAGE 2
a. (1) Received:
(a) A composite score of at least twenty-four on an ACT; or
(b) A score of at least 1180 on an SAT; and
(2) Completed the requirements in at least two of the following:
(a) A grade of at least "C" in an advanced placement course, or an equivalent
course proficiency score;
(b) A grade of at least "C" in a dual-credit English or mathematics course, or an
equivalent course proficiency score;
(c) A grade of at least "C" in one unit of algebra II, or an equivalent course
proficiency score;
(d) A grade of at least "C" in three fine arts courses;
(e) A score of at least three on an advanced placement examination;
(f) A score of at least four on an international baccalaureate examination; and
(g) A cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, or an
equivalent course proficiency score if the student was enrolled in a school
district participating in an approved innovative education program under
section 15.1-06-08.2 and the school district obtained a waiver under section
15.1-06-08.1, in core courses required for admission to institutions of higher
education under the control of the state board of higher education;
b. (1) Earned:
(a) Four units of career and technical education, including two units from a
coordinated plan of study recommended by the department of career and
technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction;
or
(b) Three units of the same world language, indigenous language, or sign
language; or
(c) Two units of career and technical education, one unit of teaching profession
education or educational methodology and one unit of advanced placement
psychology, dua l - credit psychology, child development, peer - to - peer
leadership, child-related careers, or any combination thereof;
(2) Received:
(a) A composite score of at least twenty-four on an ACT;
(b) A score of at least 1180 on an SAT; or
(c) A score of at least five on each of three WorkKeys assessments
recommended by the department of career and technical education and
approved by the superintendent of public instruction; and
(3) Successfully completed the requirements in at least two of the following:
(a) A career-ready practices course developed and recommended by the
department of career and technical education and approved by the
superintendent of public instruction;

H. B. NO. 1098 - PAGE 3
(b) A grade of at least "C" in a dual-credit course, or an equivalent course
proficiency score;
(c) A technical assessment or industry credential, as determined by the
department of career and technical education;
(d) Forty hours in a workplace learning experience, approved by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(e) Forty hours in a work-based learning experience aligned to the Strengthening
Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act [Pub. L. 115-224;
132 Stat. 1563; 20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq.]; and
(f) Received:
[1] A score of at least three on a reading and mathematics assessment
administered under subsection 1 of section 15.1-21-08 while enrolled in
grades nine through twelve; or
[2] ACT scores of at least nineteen in English and at least twenty-two in
mathematics if the school in which the student was enrolled used an
ACT assessment for accountability; or
c. (1) Received:
(a) A score of at least fifty on an ASVAB test; or
(b) A score of at least thirty-one on an ASVAB test and successfully completed
basic training in one of the branches of the United States military before high
school graduation or within ninety days of graduating from high school. Upon
successful completion from basic training, the student must provide a
certificate of completion from basic training to the department of public
instruction;
(2) Obtained a grade of at least "C" in a physical education course, or an equivalent
course proficiency score; and
(3) Completed:
(a) Any two of subparagraphs a through f of paragraph 2 of subdivision a, or any
two of subparagraphs a through f of paragraph 3 of subdivision b;
(b) Two units of junior reserve officers' training corps; or
(c) Phase one of the cadet civil air patrol program.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1098 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1098 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 2 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State